apertium-cro.cro.lexc
LEXICON PREF-ACT-VIII ! Table 6.15 [p.132]

!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!
! SINGULAR                                       ! PLURAL                                           !
!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!
@U.AGR.SG1@%<s_sg1%>:@U.AGR.SG1@b%> STEMS-V-VIII ;
@U.AGR.PL1@%<s_pl1%>:@U.AGR.PL1@b%> STEMS-V-VIII ; 
@U.AGR.SG2@%<s_sg2%>:@U.AGR.SG2@d%> STEMS-V-VIII ; 
@U.AGR.PL2@%<s_pl2%>:@U.AGR.PL2@d%> STEMS-V-VIII ; 
@U.AGR.SG3@%<s_sg3%>:@U.AGR.SG3@    STEMS-V-VIII ; 
@U.AGR.PL3@%<s_pl3%>:@U.AGR.PL3@    STEMS-V-VIII ;
!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!

LEXICON PREF-ACT-IX ! Table 6.16 [p.133]

!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!
! SINGULAR                                       ! PLURAL                                           !
!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!
@U.AGR.SG1@%<s_sg1%>:@U.AGR.SG1@b%>   STEMS-V-IX ; 
@U.AGR.PL1@%<s_pl1%>:@U.AGR.PL1@b%>   STEMS-V-IX ; 
@U.AGR.SG2@%<s_sg2%>:@U.AGR.SG2@d%>   STEMS-V-IX ; 
@U.AGR.PL2@%<s_pl2%>:@U.AGR.PL2@d%>   STEMS-V-IX ; 
@U.AGR.SG3@%<s_sg3%>:@U.AGR.SG3@      STEMS-V-IX ; 
@U.AGR.PL3@%<s_pl3%>:@U.AGR.PL3@      STEMS-V-IX ;
!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!

LEXICON PREF-ACT-X ! Table 6.17 [p.133]

!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!
! SINGULAR                                       ! PLURAL                                           !
!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!
@U.AGR.SG1@%<s_sg1%>:@U.AGR.SG1@baa%>  STEMS-V-X ; 
@U.AGR.PL1@%<s_pl1%>:@U.AGR.PL1@baa%>  STEMS-V-X ; 
@U.AGR.SG2@%<s_sg2%>:@U.AGR.SG2@da%>   STEMS-V-X ; 
@U.AGR.PL2@%<s_pl2%>:@U.AGR.PL2@da%>   STEMS-V-X ; 
@U.AGR.SG3@%<s_sg3%>:@U.AGR.SG3@       STEMS-V-X ; 
@U.AGR.PL3@%<s_pl3%>:@U.AGR.PL3@       STEMS-V-X ;
!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!

LEXICON PREF-ACT-XI ! Table 6.18 [p.134]

!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!
! SINGULAR                                       ! PLURAL                                           !
!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!
@U.AGR.SG1@%<s_sg1%>:@U.AGR.SG1@baa%>  STEMS-V-X ; 
@U.AGR.PL1@%<s_pl1%>:@U.AGR.PL1@baa%>  STEMS-V-X ; 
@U.AGR.SG2@%<s_sg2%>:@U.AGR.SG2@dáa%>  STEMS-V-X ; 
@U.AGR.PL2@%<s_pl2%>:@U.AGR.PL2@dáa%>  STEMS-V-X ; 
@U.AGR.SG3@%<s_sg3%>:@U.AGR.SG3@       STEMS-V-X ; 
@U.AGR.PL3@%<s_pl3%>:@U.AGR.PL3@       STEMS-V-X ;
!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!


LEXICON SUFF-ACT-NUM-SG 

MOOD ;

LEXICON SUFF-ACT-VII-NUM-PL 

! We have to work out what to do here phonologically:
!   - íaxua: awíaxua / awíaxuo / íaxuo
!   - óoli: awóoli / awóoluu / óoluu
!   - íkaa: awákaa / awákuu / íkuu
! normally word final vowel is dropped for the plural morpheme [-uu]
! but if the final vowel of the UR is low, like [a], the -uu is dropped to -oo
! also, when there are multiple vowels in succession at the end of the UR, the vowel is shortened, so it becomes -u
! there does not appear to be any bleeding/feeding interaction between the two, so they can both apply

%<pl%>:%>o MOOD ; 

LEXICON SUFF-ACT-VIII-NUM-PL 
! Same rules as above ? 

%<pl%>:%>o MOOD ; 

LEXICON SUFF-ACT-VII

@U.AGR.SG1@%<v%>%<actv%>:@U.AGR.SG1@ SUFF-ACT-NUM-SG ;
@U.AGR.SG2@%<v%>%<actv%>:@U.AGR.SG2@ SUFF-ACT-NUM-SG ;
@U.AGR.SG3@%<v%>%<actv%>:@U.AGR.SG3@ SUFF-ACT-NUM-SG  ;
@U.AGR.PL1@%<v%>%<actv%>:@U.AGR.PL1@ SUFF-ACT-VII-NUM-PL ;
@U.AGR.PL2@%<v%>%<actv%>:@U.AGR.PL2@ SUFF-ACT-VII-NUM-PL ;
@U.AGR.PL3@%<v%>%<actv%>:@U.AGR.PL3@ SUFF-ACT-VII-NUM-PL  ;

LEXICON SUFF-ACT-VIII

@U.AGR.SG1@%<v%>%<actv%>:@U.AGR.SG1@ SUFF-ACT-NUM-SG ;
@U.AGR.SG2@%<v%>%<actv%>:@U.AGR.SG2@ SUFF-ACT-NUM-SG ;
@U.AGR.SG3@%<v%>%<actv%>:@U.AGR.SG3@ SUFF-ACT-NUM-SG  ;
@U.AGR.PL1@%<v%>%<actv%>:@U.AGR.PL1@ SUFF-ACT-VIII-NUM-PL ;
@U.AGR.PL2@%<v%>%<actv%>:@U.AGR.PL2@ SUFF-ACT-VIII-NUM-PL ;
@U.AGR.PL3@%<v%>%<actv%>:@U.AGR.PL3@ SUFF-ACT-VIII-NUM-PL  ;

LEXICON SUFF-STAT

@U.AGR.SG1@%<v%>%<stat%>:@U.AGR.SG1@ MOOD ;
@U.AGR.SG2@%<v%>%<stat%>:@U.AGR.SG2@ MOOD ;
@U.AGR.SG3@%<v%>%<stat%>:@U.AGR.SG3@ MOOD ;
@U.AGR.PL1@%<v%>%<actv%>:@U.AGR.PL1@ MOOD ;
@U.AGR.PL2@%<v%>%<actv%>:@U.AGR.PL2@%>o MOOD ;
@U.AGR.PL3@%<v%>%<actv%>:@U.AGR.PL3@%>o MOOD ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON POST-CITE

%+taa%<post%>:%>taa         S-DET ;               ! -taa `along' PATH
%+n%<post%>:%>n             S-DET ;               ! -n `at, on; from' LOC,SRC
                            S-DET ; 

LEXICON POST-STEM

%+ss%<post%>:%>ss           S-DET ;                 ! -ss(aa) `to, toward; from' GOAL,SRC
%+ko%<post%>:%>ko           S-DET ;                 ! -ko `at, to, from' LOC-GEN
                            S-DET ; 

!LEXICON POST-NONPROD
!
!%+kaa%<post%>:%>kaa K ;               ! -kaa `from' SRC
!%+hchée%<post%>:%>hchée K ;           ! -hchée `here and there' DIST
!%+chiisaa%<post%>:%>chiisaa K ;       ! -chiisaa `right there' LOC-SPEC
!%+htée%<post%>:%>htée K ;             ! -htée `right there' LOC-SPEC
!%+kísshi%<post%>:%>kísshi             ! -kísshi 'casually, carefree'
! not sure about the pos tag after gloss at the moment
!%+hili%<post%>:hili K ;	       ! -hili 'very, very much'
!%+aachí%<post%>:aachí K ; 	       ! -aachí 'approximative'
!%+lichí%<post%>:lichí K ;	       ! -lichí 'approximative' Dir/LR
!%+aahi%<post%>:aahi K ;	       ! -aahi 'distributive'
!%+shta%<post%>:shta K ; 	       ! -shta 'very'
!%+kaáshi%<post%>:kaáshi K ;	       ! -kaáshi 'very much, really (augmentative)'
!%+káata%<post%>:káata K ; 	       ! -káata 'diminutive'
!%+táahili%<post%>:táahili K ;	       ! -táahili 'completely, totally'
!%+táali%<post%>:táali K ;	       ! -táali 'completely, totally' Dir/LR
!%+laash%<post%>:laash K ; 	       ! -laash 'very (sentence final)'
!%+i%<post%>:i K ;		       ! -i 'habitual'
!%+ta%<post%>:ta K ;		       ! -ta 'appear to, seem'
!%+ta%<post%>:ta K ;		       ! -ta 'distributive plural'
!%+dee%<post%>:dee K ;		       ! -dee 'inchoative'


LEXICON S-DET

%+sh%<det%>:%>sh K  ; 
%+m%<det%>:%>m   K  ; 

LEXICON NOMINAL

POST-CITE ;
POST-STEM ;

LEXICON N

%<n%>: NOMINAL ;

LEXICON PROP-F

%<np%>%<f%>: NOMINAL ; 

LEXICON PROP-M

%<np%>%<m%>: NOMINAL ; 


LEXICON PERS-II

ii%<prn%>%<pers%>%<sg1%>:b%>ii # ; 
ii%<prn%>%<pers%>%<sg2%>:d%>ii # ; 
ii%<prn%>%<pers%>%<sg3%>:ii # ; 
ii%<prn%>%<pers%>%<pl1%>:b%>íilu # ; 
ii%<prn%>%<pers%>%<pl2%>:d%>íilu # ; 
ii%<prn%>%<pers%>%<pl3%>:íilu # ; 

LEXICON PERS-ÍILAA

íilaa%<prn%>%<pers%>%<refl%>%<sp1%>:b%>íilaa # ; 
íilaa%<prn%>%<pers%>%<refl%>%<sp2%>:d%>íilaa # ; 
íilaa%<prn%>%<pers%>%<refl%>%<sp3%>:íilaa # ; 

LEXICON PERS-ÍH

íh%<prn%>%<pers%>%<contr%>%<sg1%>:b%>íh # ; 
íh%<prn%>%<pers%>%<contr%>%<sg2%>:d%>íh # ; 
íh%<prn%>%<pers%>%<contr%>%<sg3%>:íh # ; 
íh%<prn%>%<pers%>%<contr%>%<pl1%>:b%>íiluh # ; 
íh%<prn%>%<pers%>%<contr%>%<pl2%>:d%>íiluh # ; 
íh%<prn%>%<pers%>%<contr%>%<pl3%>:íiluh # ; 

LEXICON PERS-ÍK

ík%<prn%>%<pers%>%<contr%>%<sg1%>:b%>ík # ; 
ík%<prn%>%<pers%>%<contr%>%<sg2%>:d%>ík # ; 
ík%<prn%>%<pers%>%<contr%>%<sg3%>:ík # ; 
ík%<prn%>%<pers%>%<contr%>%<pl1%>:b%>íiluk # ; 
ík%<prn%>%<pers%>%<contr%>%<pl2%>:d%>íiluk # ; 
ík%<prn%>%<pers%>%<contr%>%<pl3%>:íiluk # ; 

LEXICON Nouns
bii:bii N ; ! "stone" ! Ref/gra:43
bia:bia N ; ! "woman ! Ref/gra:43
ii:ii N ; ! "mouth ! Ref/gra:43
suú:suú N ; ! "thunder ! Ref/gra:43
áapa:áapa N ; ! "leaf ! Ref/gra:43
balá:balá N ; ! "wood ! Ref/gra:43
bilía:bilía N ; ! "door ! Ref/gra:43
cheéta:cheéta N ; ! "wolf ! Ref/gra:43
dachká:dachká N ; ! "twin ! Ref/gra:43
iitchí:iitchí N ; ! "cane ! Ref/gra:43
apáaka:apáaka N ; ! "mosquito" ! Ref/gra:44
biláxa:biláxa N ; ! "drum, bucket"
chíilapi:chíilapi N ; ! "bull"
dakáaka:dakáaka N ; ! "bird"
póopahta:póopahta N ; ! "owl"
xoóxaashi:xoóxaashi N ; ! "corn"
chiwáwuuli:chiwáwuuli N ; ! "rat"
ditchiláachi:ditchiláachi N ; ! "dangerous"
ilíchile:ilíchile N ; ! "echo"
óosshee:óosshee N ; ! "food" ! Ref/gra:52
apá:apá N ; ! "nose" ! Ref/gra:52
dúula:dúula N ; ! "back" ! Ref/gra:54
dáaka:dáaka N ; ! "child, offspring"
dáakaaxee:daakaaxee N ; ! "back of thigh"
daasá:daasá N ; ! "heart" ! Ref/gra:54
dáashuli:dáashuli N ; ! "thigh"
dáata:dáata  N ; ! "calf of leg"
datchawuú:datchawuú  N ; ! "armpit"
dáxpa:dáxpa  N ; ! "side of hip"
déeshi:déeshi  N ; ! "tongue"
dúuleepa:dúuleepa  N ; ! "jaw"
dúusa:dúusa  N ; ! "rib"
ishtá:ishtá  N ; ! "eye" ! Ref/gra:55
ichí:ichí  N ; ! "foot" ! Ref/gra:55
icheechí:icheechí  N ; ! "heel" ! Ref/gra:55
ichklísa:ichklísa  N ; ! "ankle" ! Ref/gra:55
iláshpi:iláshpi  N ; ! "shoulder" ! Ref/gra:55
isbassá:isbassá  N ; ! "thumb" ! Ref/gra:55
isbaxxáa:isbaxxáa  N ; ! "elbow" ! Ref/gra:55
ischí:ischí  N ; ! "hand" ! Ref/gra:55
ishíssaa:ishíssaa  N ; ! "lower torso" ! Ref/gra:55
ishkulí:ishkulí  N ; ! "finger" ! Ref/gra:55
ishtá:ishtá  N ; ! "eye" ! Ref/gra:55
ishúu:ishúu  N ; ! "base of neck" ! Ref/gra:55
ishúushi:ishúushi  N ; ! "knee" ! Ref/gra:55
isísa:isísa  N ; ! "buttocks" ! Ref/gra:55
iskuchkápi:iskuchkápi  N ; ! "wrist" ! Ref/gra:55
ispaxpá:ispaxpá  N ; ! "fingernail" ! Ref/gra:55
isshií:isshií  N ; ! "hair" ! Ref/gra:55
isshulí:isshulí  N ; ! "biceps" ! Ref/gra:55
istéhpa:istéhpa  N ; ! "navel" ! Ref/gra:55
itáxpuu:itáxpuu  N ; ! "toenail, claw" ! Ref/gra:55
itbuú:itbuú N ; ! "sole" ! Ref/gra:55
itchúa:itchúa N ; ! "side of head" ! Ref/gra:55
itchúupa:itchúupa N ; ! "shin" ! Ref/gra:55
iilápxa:iilápxa N ; ! "father" ! Ref/gra:56
axkúxa:axkúxa N ; ! "inner ear" ! Ref/gra:56
ahpá:ahpá N ; ! "outer ear" ! Ref/gra:56
alapálaa:alapálaa N ; ! "buttock" ! Ref/gra:56
alássheee:alásshee N ; ! "muscle" ! Ref/gra:56
alaxxaaló:alaxxaaló N ; ! "spine" ! Ref/gra:56
apásaa:apásaa N ; ! "upper torso" ! Ref/gra:56
apá:apá N ; ! "nose" ! Ref/gra:56
apitchúu:apitchúu N ; ! "gall bladder" ! Ref/gra:56
apitá:apitá N ; ! "liver" ! Ref/gra:56
axúa:axúa N ; ! "body" ! Ref/gra:56
axxíi:axxíi N ; ! "forehead" ! Ref/gra:56
áachi:áachi N ; ! "breast" ! Ref/gra:56
áali:áali N ; ! "arm" ! Ref/gra:56
áapa:áapa N ; ! "neck" ! Ref/gra:56
aashúu:aashúu N ; ! "head" ! Ref/gra:56
áaxuhka:áaxuhka N ; ! "kidney" ! Ref/gra:56
eelá:eelá N ; ! "belly" ! Ref/gra:56
ihkapílii:ihkapílii N ; ! "foretop" ! Ref/gra:56
ihtá:ihtá N ; ! "molar" ! Ref/gra:56
íi:íi N ; ! "mouth" ! Ref/gra:56
ií:ií N ; ! "tooth" ! Ref/gra:56
íihchii:íihchii N ; ! "beard" ! Ref/gra:56
íihka:íihka N ; ! "chin" ! Ref/gra:56
iisá:iisá N ; ! "face" ! Ref/gra:56
íishpuu:íishpuu N ; ! "abdommen" ! Ref/gra:56
úushi:úushi N ; ! "rectum" ! Ref/gra:56
aksáa:aksáa N ; ! "parent" ! Ref/gra:56
akúa:akúa N ; ! "woman's husband's sister" ! Ref/gra:56
iiká:iiká N ; ! "man's older brother" ! Ref/gra:56
iilápxa:iilápxa N ; ! "man's father" ! Ref/gra:56
usshí:usshí N ; ! "man's mother-in-law; tabooed relative" ! Ref/gra:56
uá:uá N ; ! "wife" ! Ref/gra:56
alaachíisa:alaachíisa N ; ! "tendon" ! Ref/gra:57
alascheewí:alascheewí N ; ! "gland" ! Ref/gra:57
alashkúu:alashkúu N ; ! "joint" ! Ref/gra:57
alaxaawí:alaxaawí N ; ! "limb" ! Ref/gra:57
alúa:alúa N ; ! "abdomen" ! Ref/gra:57
axóoxii:axóoxii N ; ! "knee cap" ! Ref/gra:57
dáaxo:dáaxo N ; ! "lung" ! Ref/gra:57
píaxiita:píaxiita N ; ! "spleen" ! Ref/gra:57
duushúu:duushúu N ; ! "chest" ! Ref/gra:57
chiláa:chiláa N ; ! "husband" ! Ref/gra:57
huupá:huupá N ; ! "shoe" ! Ref/gra:58
bishká:bishká N ; ! "dog" ! Ref/gra:58
iichíili:iichíili N ; ! "horse" ! Ref/gra:58
buú:buú N ; ! "song" ! Ref/gra:58
ísshi:ísshi N ; ! "case, outer cover" ! Ref/gra:91
alápee:alápee N ; ! "forest fire, range fire"
